vi: Phù hợp với loại thiết bị điện: Máy khoan; Máy cưa xích; Máy xới; Máy cắt cỏ; Máy băm gỗ; Máy xén mép cỏ; Máy tỉa hàng rào; Máy xén cỏ; Máy quét cỏ; Máy hút cỏ; Máy thổi lá cây; Bộ chia log; Dao đa năng; Cưa cực; Máy chà chạy điện; Máy phun rửa áp lực; Máy phun cát; Máy thổi tuyết; Máy xới đất; Máy xén cỏ; Khác
lt-LT: Tinka sodo ir daržo technikos tipui: Sraigtas; Grandininis pjūklas; Kultivatorius; Skarifikatorius; Sodo smulkintuvas; Žoliapjovė-trimeris; Gyvatvorių žirklės; Vejapjovė; Lauko šlavyklė; Vejos siurbliai; Lapų pūstuvas; Rąstų skaldytuvas; Universalus; Sekatorius; Elektrinis šepetys; Slėginis ploviklis; Smėlio pūtiklis; Sniego pūstuvas; Vejos kultivatorius; Piktžolių žoliapjovė; Kita
es: Adecuado para el tipo de equipo eléctrico: Barrena; Motosierra; Cultivador; Desbrozadora; Trituradora de jardín; Recortadoras de césped; Cortasetos; Cortadora de césped; Barredora de césped; Aspiradora de césped; Soplador de hojas; Cortadora de troncos; Multiherramienta; Sierra de pértiga; Depuradora de alta potencia; Lavadora a presión; Chorro de arena; Fresadora de nieve; Arado cincel; Desbrozadora; Otros
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο εξοπλισμού ισχύος: Τρύπανο ξυλουργού; Αλυσοπρίονο; Καλλιεργητής; Dethatcher; Καταστροφέας κήπου; Κουρευτικές μηχανές άκρων; Ψαλίδι θάμνων; Χλοοκοπτικό; Σκούπες χλοοτάπητα; Ηλεκτρικές σκούπες γκαζόν; Φυσητήρας φύλλων; Μηχανές σχισίματος κορμών; Multi-tool; κοντάρι πριόνι; Ηλεκτρικές βούρτσες τριψίματος; Πιεστικό πλυστικό; Αμμοβολής; Εκχιονιστική μηχανή; Οιακοστροφίο; Χορτοκοπτικό ζιζανίων; Άλλο
it: Adatto per il tipo di apparecchiatura elettrica: Coclea; Motosega; Coltivatore; Rasaerba; Trituratore da giardino; Tosaerba; Tagliasiepi; Tagliaerba; Spazzatrice per prato; Aspiratore per prato; Soffiatore per foglie; Spaccalegna; Multiuso; Sega ad asta; Lavasciuga alimentata; Getto a pressione; Sabbiatrice; Soffiatore da neve; Timone; Tosaerba a filo; Altro
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto električne opreme: Vrtalni polž; Motorna žaga; Kultivator; Prezračevalnik; Vrtni drobilnik; Robilnik trave; Škarje za živo mejo; Kosilnica; Pometač trate; Sesalnik za trato; Puhalnik listja; Cepilnik drv; Večnamensko orodje; Teleskopska žaga; Električni čistilna krtača; Visokotlačni čistilnik; Peskalnik; Snežna freza; Kultivator; Obrezovalnik plevela; Drugo
pl: Odpowiednie do rodzaju sprzętu zasilanego elektrycznie: Świder spiralny; Piła łańcuchowa; Kultywator; Rozpulchniacz; Łuparka do drewna; Krawędziarka do trawy; Przycinarka do żywopłotu; Kosiarka do trawy; Zamiataczka trawnikowa; Odkurzacz do trawników; Dmuchawa do liści; Rozdrabniacz do drewna; Narzędzie wielofunkcyjne; Piła na wysięgniku; Szorowarka elektryczna; Myjka ciśnieniowa; Piaskarka wodna; Odśnieżarka; Rumpel; Przycinarka do chwastów; Pozostałe
nl: Type geschikt voor elektrische apparatuur: Vijzel; Kettingzaag; Cultivator; Verticuteermachine; Tuinversnipperaar; Graskantensnijder; Heggenschaar; Grasmaaier; Gazonvegers; Gazonzuiger; Bladblazer; Houtklovers; Multi-tool; Telescoopzaag; Power schrobber; Hogedrukreiniger; Zandstralers; Sneeuwblazer; Tiller; Tuinschaar; Andere
zh-TW: 適用電力設備類型: 螺旋鑽; 電鋸; 耕耘機; 割草機; 花園粉碎機; 割草機; 剪枝機; 修草機; 拖式草地清潔機; 真空吸葉機; 掃葉機; 劈木機; 多功能工具; 長柄鋸; 動力洗地機; 高壓清洗機; 噴砂機; 除雪車; 耕作機; 除草機; 其他
da: Velegnet til strømudstyrstype: Snegl; Kædesav; Kultivator; Dethatcher; Havekværn; Græskantskærer; Hækkeklipper; Plæneklipper; Plæneopsamler; Løvsuger til græsplæne; Løvblæser; Brændekløver; Multiværktøj; Stangsav; Eldreven moppe; Højtryksrenser; Sandblæser; Snekaster; Jordfræser; Græstrimmer; Andet
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип енергийно оборудване: Шнек; Верижен трион; Култиватор; Разрохквач; Градински шредер; Машина за кантоване на трева; Ножица за жив плет; Косачка за трева; Машина за почистване на трева; Прахосмукачка за трева; Духалка за листа; Машина за цепене на дърва; Мултифункционален инструмент; Полюсен трион; Електрически скрубер; Миялна машина под налягане; Пясъкоструйка; Снегорин; Фреза; Тример за плевели; Други
fi: Soveltuu voimalaitteille: Auger; Moottorisaha; Kultivaattori; Jyrsin; Puutarhasilppuri; Nurmikon reunaleikkurit; Pensasleikkurit; Ruohonleikkurit; Lehtien- ja ruohonkerääjät; Nurmikkoimurit; Lehtipuhaltimet; Halkaisukoneet; Monikäyttötyökalu; Oksasahan tangot; Tehopesurit; Painepesuri; Hiekkapuhallus; Lumilinko; Tiller; Ruohotrimmeri; Muu
hu: Elektromos berendezés típusa: Fúró; Láncfűrész; Kultivátor; Fűhántoló; Kerti aprítógép; Fűszegélyező; Sövénynyíró; Fűnyíró; Gyepseprő; Gyepporszívó; Levélfúvó; Rönkhasító; Többfunkciós; Teleszkópos fűrész; Motoros súroló; Nagynyomású mosó; Homokfúvó; Hófúvó; Földművelő gép; Gyomlálógép; Egyéb
de: Geeignet für Kraftgerätetyp: Schnecke; Kettensäge; Grubber; Vertikutierer; Gartenhäcksler; Rasenkantentrimmer; Heckenschere; Rasenmäher; Rasenkehrmaschine; Laubsauger; Laubbläser; Holzspalter; Mehrzweck; Stangensäge; Elektrische Reinigungsbürste; Hochdruckreiniger; Sandstrahler; Schneefräse; Krümler; Rasentrimmer & Freischneider; Sonstiges
th: เหมาะกับประเภทอุปกรณ์ไฟฟ้า: สว่าน; เลื่อยยนต์; เครื่องตัดหญ้า; เครื่องลอกเศษหญ้า; เครื่องย่อยกิ่งไม้; เครื่องแต่งขอบสนามหญ้า; ที่ตัดแต่งพุ่มไม้; เครื่องตัดหญ้า; เครื่องกวาดเก็บหญ้า; เครื่องดูดสำหรับสนามหญ้า; เครื่องเป่าใบไม้; เครื่องผ่าท่อนไม้; มีดอเนกประสงค์; เครื่องตัดแต่งกิ่งไม้; เครื่องขัดไฟฟ้า; เครื่องฉีดน้ำแรงดันสูง; เครื่องพ่นทราย; เครื่องพ่นหิมะ; เครื่องไถพรวน; เครื่องเล็มหญ้า; อื่นๆ
ja: 電源装置タイプに最適: オーガー; チェーンソー; 耕運機; デサッチャー; ガーデンシュレッダー; キワ刈用芝刈り機; ヘッジトリマー; 芝刈り機; 芝生用スイーパー; 芝生用掃除機; ブロワー; 薪割機; マルチツール; 高枝切りチェーンソー; 電動スクラバー; 高圧洗浄機; サンドブラスター; 除雪機; 耕運機; 草刈り機; その他
zh-CN: 适用的电力设备类型: 螺旋钻; 电锯; 耕耘机; 枯草清理机; 园艺粉碎机; 草坪修边机; 修剪机; 割草机; 草坪清理机; 草坪吸草机; 吹叶机; 劈木机; 多功能工具; 高枝锯; 强力清洁刷; 高压清洗机; 喷砂机; 除雪机; 翻土机; 杂草修边机; 其他
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de echipament electric: Snec; Ferăstrău cu lanț; Cultivator; Scarificator/aerator; Tocător de deșeuri din gradină; Mașină de tăiat iarbă; Mașină de tuns gard viu; Mașină de tuns gazonul; Mașină de măturat gazonul; Aspirator pentru gazon; Suflantă pentru frunze; Dispozitiv de despicat bușteni; Unealtă universală; Fierăstrău pentru elagaj; Aparat de curățat electric; Aparat de spălat cu presiune; Aparat de sablare; Freză de zăpadă; Motocultivator; Mașină de tăiat buruieni; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta vrtnih alata za koje je prikladno: Svrdlo; Motorna pila; Kultivator; Stroj za obradu tla sa zupcima; Vrtna sjeckalica; Trimer za rub travnjaka; Škare za živicu; Kosilica za travu; Čistač travnjaka; Usisivač za travnjak; Puhač za lišće; Cjepač drva; Multi-tool; Stupna pila; Električni perač; Tlačni čistač; Pjeskarilica; Puhač za snijeg; Kopačica; Trimer za korov; Ostalo
tr: Elektrikli ekipman tipine uygun: Burgu; Elektrikli testere; Kültivatör; Çim havalandırma makinesi; Bahçe parçalayıcı; Çim kenarı düzelticiler; Çit düzenleyici; Çim biçme makineleri; Çim süpürgesi; Çim vakumu; Yaprak üfleme makineleri; Kütük ayırıcı; Çok amaçlı alet; Direk testeresi; Elektrikli yıkayıcı; Basınçlı yıkama makinesi; Kumlama makinesi; Kar üfleme makinesi; Yeke; Yabancı ot temizleme makinesi; Diğer
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de equipamento elétrico: Verruma; Motosserra; Cultivador; Escarificador; Triturador de jardim; Corta-relva; Corta-sebes; Cortador de relva; Varredor de relva; Aspirador de relva; Soprador de folhas; Rachador de lenha; Multiferramentas; Serra de vara; Limpador de superfícies elétrico; Anilha de pressão; Decapador de areia; Soprador de neve; Leme; Aparador de erva; Outro
ru: Для какого типа электрооборудования: Шнек; Бензопила; Культиватор; Аэратор для газона; Садовый измельчитель; Кромкорез; Кусторез; Газонокосилка; Подметальная машина для газона; Садовый пылесос; Садовая воздуходувка; Дровокол; Многофункциональный инструмент; Высоторез; Электрическая щетка; Мойка высокого давления; Пескоструйный аппарат; Снегоуборщик; Культиватор; Косилка-триммер; Другое
ko: 전력 장비 유형에 적합: 나사송곳; 전기톱; 경운기; 디태처; 톱밥 제조기; 예초기; 전정기; 잔디깎이; 잔디 청소기; 잔디용 진공청소기; 낙엽 제거기; 장작 절단기; 멀티툴; 장대 톱; 전동 바닥 청소기; 고압 세척기; 샌드 블라스터; 제설기; 경운기; 잡초 제거기; 기타
fr: Convient au type d’équipement électrique: Tarière; Tronçonneuse; Cultivateur; Déchaumeuse; Broyeur de végétaux; Coupe-gazon; Taille-haies; Tondeuse à gazon; Balai ramasseur; Aspirateur à gazon; Souffleur de feuilles; Fendeuse de bûches; Multi-outil; Scie à perche; Épurateur électrique; Nettoyeur à haute pression; Sableuse; Souffleuse à neige; Motoculteur; Débroussailleuse; Autre
sv: Lämplig för elektrisk utrustning: Borr; Motorsåg; Kultivator; Ogräsrensningsenhet; Kompostkvarn för trädgården; Kanttrimmare; Häcktrimning; Gräsklippare; Lövsamlare; Gräsmattedammsugare; Lövblås; Vedklyvar; Multiverktyg; Polsåg; Motorskrubber; Högtryckstvätt; Sandbläster; Snöslunga; Rorkult; Ogrästrimmer; Annat
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de equipamento de energia: Broca; Motosserra; Cultivador; Cortador de grama; Triturador para jardim; Cortadores de grama; Aparador de cercas; Cortador grama; Varredor de grama; Aspirador de jardim; Soprador de folhas; Cortador de lenha; Multiferramentas; Serra de poda; Esfregão elétrico; Lavadora de alta pressão; Jateador de areia; Limpador de neve; Leme; Aparador de ervas daninhas; Outro
cs: Vhodné pro typ energetického zařízení: Vrták; Motorová pila; Kultivátor; Strojní hrabání; Zahradní drtič; Obrubovač trávníku; Nůžky na živé ploty; Sekačka na trávu; Zametač trávy; Vysavač na trávník; Foukače na listí; Štípač dřeva; Víceúčelový nástroj; Tyčová pila; Výkonný kartáč; Tlakový čistič; Pískový tryskač; Sněhová fréza; Tiller; Vyžínač plevele; Jiné
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ elektrického zariadenia: Nebožiec; Motorová píla; Kultivátor; Vetrikutátor; Záhradný drvič; Orezávač trávy; Nožnice na živý plot; Kosačka na trávu; Zberný kôš na trávu; Vysávač trávnika; Fúkač lístia; Štiepačka guľatiny; Viacúčelový nástroj; Teleskopická píla; Vysokotlakový čistiaci stroj; Tlaková umývačka; Pieskovač; Snehová fréza; Kultivátor; Strihač buriny; Iné
en: Suitable for power equipment type: Auger; Chainsaw; Cultivator; Dethatcher; Garden shredder; Grass edger; Hedge trimmer; Lawn mower; Lawn sweeper; Lawn vacuum; Leaf blower; Log splitter; Multi-tool; Pole saw; Power scrubber; Pressure washer; Sand blaster; Snow blower; Tiller; Weed trimmer; Other
nb: Egnet for strømutstyrstype: Naver; Motorsag; Kultivator; Mosefjerner; Hagekvern; Gresstrimmere; Hekktrimmere; Gressklipper; Gressfeiere; Plenstøvsuger; Løvblåser; Vedkløyver; Flerberøring; Stolpesag; Strømdreven gulvvasker; Høytrykksspyler; Sandblåser; Snøfreser; Styrepinne; Ugressklipper; Annen